Utah statutes.
77-10a-9.   Oath for grand jurors.

Grand jurors and those selected as alternates shall take the following oath:

"Do you, and each of you, solemnly swear that you will diligently inquire into and make true presentment or indictment of all matters and things as are given you in charge or otherwise come to your knowledge, touching upon your grand jury service; to keep secret the counsel of the state, your fellows, and yourselves; to not present or indict any person through hatred, malice, or ill will; to not leave any person unpresented or unindicted through fear, favor, or affection, nor for any reward, or hope or promise thereof; but in all your investigations, presentments, and indictments to seek and present the truth, the whole truth and nothing but the truth, to the best of your skill and understanding? If so, answer 'I do.'"

